Alaska statutes. Title 11. Criminal Law.
Article 1. General Purposes.

Sec. 11.81.100.
General purposes.

The general purposes of this title are to

proscribe conduct that unjustifiably and inexcusably causes or threatens substantial harm to individual or public interests;

give fair warning of the nature of the conduct constituting an offense;

define the act or omission and accompanying culpable mental state that constitute each offense and limit the condemnation of conduct as criminal when it is without fault; and

differentiate on reasonable grounds between serious and minor offenses.

History.

(§ 10 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Definition of “conduct,” “offense,” “culpable mental state” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Original Code Provision — None.

TD: V, 6.